Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 5. Regulation and Inspection of Sheep

§ 11-19-501.
When notice of importation to be made; contents; applicability of
rules and regulations of board.

Any person intending to bring or cause to be brought any sheep from any other state or territory, the District of Columbia or any foreign country into Wyoming in any manner except by shipping them through the state by railroad or truck, shall, ten (10) days before crossing the state line, notify the executive officer of the board of the proposed action. The notice shall set forth the number of sheep, the brands or marks thereon, the name of the owner and the locality from which the sheep came and through which they have been driven.

Sheep trailed or shipped into the state from adjoining states for immediate interstate shipment or for show and exhibition purposes, sheep grazing along and across state lines, and sheep shipped from any part of this state to feed yards in any other part of the state when shipment is made by interstate route, are governed by the rules and regulations of the board.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 13; C.S. 1910, § 2694; Laws 1913, ch. 122, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3203; Laws 1931, ch. 66, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-1413; C.S. 1945, § 56-407; W.S. 1957, § 11-453; W.S. 1977, §

11-27-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Jurisdiction. —

Justice of the peace has no jurisdiction to impose sentence upon one accused of unlawfully bringing sheep into state without notifying board of sheep commissioners (now livestock board), since fine authorized to be imposed is in excess of his jurisdiction. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

§ 11-19-502.
Unloading sheep in transit prohibited; exception; cost of enforcement.

Any sheep in transit
through this state shall not be unloaded for any purpose except for
feeding, and shall be held in the feed yards or in grazing grounds
and not allowed to leave. All expenses of enforcing this section shall
be paid by the owner of the sheep.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 15; C.S. 1910, § 2696; C.S. 1920, § 3205; R.S. 1931, § 67-1415; C.S. 1945, § 56-409; W.S. 1957, § 11-455; W.S. 1977, § 11-27-108; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-19-503.
Bringing infected sheep into state prohibited.

It is unlawful for any
person to bring into this state any sheep infected with any infectious
or contagious disease, or that have been exposed to such disease.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 12; C.S. 1910, § 2693; C.S. 1920, § 3202; R.S. 1931, § 67-1412; C.S. 1945, § 56-406; W.S. 1957, § 11-456; W.S. 1977, § 11-27-109; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Exercise of police power. —

This section is not a regulation of commerce between the states, but a reasonable exercise of the state's police power. Patrick v. State, 17 Wyo. 260, 98 P. 588,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1908).

Jurisdiction of court. —

The district court of a county located in the interior of the state has jurisdiction in a prosecution under this section. Patrick v. State, 17 Wyo. 260, 98 P. 588,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1908).

Pleadings. —

In an information charging accused with bringing diseased sheep into the state, and also causing such sheep to be brought into the state, crime was sufficiently charged, allegation that accused caused the sheep to be brought into the state being mere surplusage. Patrick v. State, 17 Wyo. 260, 98 P. 588,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1908).

Defect in information charging accused with bringing diseased sheep into state was waived by pleading to the merits. Patrick v. State, 17 Wyo. 260, 98 P. 588,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1908).

§ 11-19-504.
Refusal to give information deemed misdemeanor.

Any herder or other person
in charge of sheep who willfully refuses to give an inspector information
as to the condition of sheep in his charge is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable as provided by W.S.

11-19-506

.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 18; C.S. 1910, § 2699; C.S. 1920, § 3208; R.S. 1931, § 67-1418; C.S. 1945, § 56-412; W.S. 1957, § 11-459; W.S. 1977, § 11-27-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-19-505.
Owners
to be jointly and severally liable; when arrest necessary; service
of summons and complaint.

In any action arising
under W.S.

11-19-501

through

11-19-505

, all persons owning or having control of the sheep concerning
which the action is had, are liable severally and jointly. In criminal
actions, no arrest is necessary except in case of nonresident persons,
but a summons containing notice of the time and place of trial, together
with a copy of the complaint filed in a circuit court, or in the court
in which the action is commenced, shall be served in the same manner
and for the length of time provided by law for the service of summons
in civil cases.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 18; C.S. 1910, § 2699; C.S. 1920, § 3208; R.S. 1931, § 67-1418; C.S. 1945, § 56-412; W.S. 1957, § 11-459; W.S. 1977, § 11-27-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

For definition of “stock owner,” see §

11-20-101

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “in a circuit court” for “before a justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 11-19-506.
Penalties.

Any person who violates W.S.

11-19-501

through

11-19-505

shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)
or imprisoned not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 60, §§ 12, 13, 15, 18; C.S. 1910, §§ 2693, 2694, 2696, 2699; Laws 1913, ch. 122, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 3202, 3203, 3205, 3208; Laws 1931, ch. 66, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 67-1412, 67-1413, 67-1415, 67-1418; C.S. 1945, §§ 56-406, 56-407, 56-409, 56-412; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-453, 11-455, 11-456, 11-459; W.S. 1977, §§

11-19-506

,

11-27-106

, 11-27-108, 11-27-109, 11-27-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Jurisdiction. —

Justice of the peace has no jurisdiction to impose sentence upon one accused of unlawfully bringing sheep into state without notifying board of sheep commissioners (now livestock board), since fine authorized to be imposed is in excess of his jurisdiction. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

The district court of a county located in the interior of the state has jurisdiction in a prosecution under this section. Patrick v. State, 17 Wyo. 260, 98 P. 588,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1908).